Florida, session 2026, SB244.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 14 15 Section 1.âSection 515.27, Florida Statutes, is amended to 16 read: 17 515.27âResidential swimming pool safety feature options; 18 penalties.â 19 (1)âIn order to pass final inspection and receive a 20 certificate of completion, a residential swimming pool must meet 21 at least one of the following requirements relating to pool 22 safety features: 23 (a)âThe pool must be isolated from access to a home by an 24 enclosure that meets the pool barrier requirements of s. 515.29; 25 (b)âThe pool must be equipped with an approved safety pool 26 cover; 27 (c)âAll doors and windows providing direct access from the 28 home to the pool must be equipped with an exit alarm that has a 29 minimum sound pressure rating of 85 dB A at 10 feet; 30 (d)âAll doors providing direct access from the home to the 31 pool must be equipped with a self-closing, self-latching device 32 with a release mechanism placed no lower than 54 inches above 33 the floor; or 34 (e)âA swimming pool alarm that, when placed in a pool, 35 sounds an alarm upon detection of an accidental or unauthorized 36 entrance into the water. Such pool alarm must meet and be 37 independently certified to ASTM Standard F2208, titled âStandard 38 Safety Specification for Residential Pool Alarms,â which 39 includes surface motion, pressure, sonar, laser, and infrared 40 alarms. For purposes of this paragraph, the term âswimming pool 41 alarmâ does not include any swimming protection alarm device 42 designed for individual use, such as an alarm attached to a 43 child that sounds when the child exceeds a certain distance or 44 becomes submerged in water. 45 (2)âA swimming pool, regardless of the year in which the 46 pool was built, located on residential real property that is 47 transferred or sold on or after October 1, 2026, must be 48 equipped with at least one pool safety feature as required in 49 subsection (1). A home inspector licensed under s. 468.8314 must 50 report a violation of this subsection to a local enforcement 51 agency as defined in s. 553.71. If the inspected pool safety 52 feature is the pool barrier, it must meet all of the 53 requirements in s. 515.29. 54 (3)(2)âA person who fails to equip a new residential 55 swimming pool with at least one pool safety feature as required 56 in subsection (1) or subsection (2) commits a misdemeanor of the 57 second degree, punishable as provided in s. 775.082 or s. 58 775.083, except that no penalty shall be imposed if the person, 59 within 45 days after arrest or issuance of a summons or a notice 60 to appear, has equipped the pool with at least one safety 61 feature as required in subsection (1) or subsection (2) and has 62 attended a drowning prevention education program established by 63 s. 515.31. However, the requirement of attending a drowning 64 prevention education program is waived if such program is not 65 offered within 45 days after issuance of the citation. 66 Section 2.âSubsection (1) of section 515.31, Florida 67 Statutes, is amended to read: 68 515.31âDrowning prevention education program; public 69 information publication.â 70 (1)âThe department shall develop a drowning prevention 71 education program. Such program must, which shall be made 72 available to the public at the state and local levels and is 73 which shall be required as set forth in s. 515.27(3) s. 74 515.27(2) for persons in violation of the pool safety 75 requirements of this chapter. The department may charge a fee, 76 not to exceed $100, for attendance at such a program. The 77 drowning prevention education program must shall be funded using 78 fee proceeds, state funds appropriated for such purpose, and 79 grants. The department, in lieu of developing its own program, 80 may adopt a nationally recognized drowning prevention education 81 program to be approved for use in local safety education 82 programs, as provided in rule of the department. 83 Section 3.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.